Louisiana, session 2026, SB452.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:214.30(J) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§214.30. Coastal use permits
A.(1) * * *
J. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, neither the secretary
nor the approved local program of any parish shall issue a coastal use permit
for any work or construction on Lake Maurepas, except for the following:
(1) Construction, creation, alteration, improvement, extension, or
maintenance of any wharf, pier, dock, bulkhead, landfill, or structure.
(2) Repair or replacement of an existing pipeline or well facility.
(3) Dredging or disposal of dredge material.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-805 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 452